Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1702
Violations; penalty.

The disobedience by the sheriff of the command of any such process is a contempt of the court from which it was issued, and may be punished by the same accordingly, and he is further liable to the action of any person injured thereby.

Laws 1879, § 117, p. 385;

R.S.1913, § 5654;

C.S.1922, § 4981;

C.S.1929, § 26-1402;

R.S.1943, § 23-1702.

Officer is liable in damages for failure to make return to execution. Ehlers v. Gallagher, 147 Neb. 97, 2 N.W.2d 396 (1946).

Court will mandamus sheriff to make arrest when proper warrant from another county is placed in his hands and he refuses to act. State ex rel. Johnson v. Goble, 136 Neb. 242, 285 N.W. 569 (1939).

Sheriff is not liable for negligence in levy of writ where plaintiff or his attorney contributed to negligence. Parrott v. McDonald, 72 Neb. 97, 100 N.W. 132 (1904).